Massachusetts, session 194th, H3068.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 57 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, in line 12, the figure “14” and inserting in place thereof the
following figure:- 8.
Section 57C of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in
line 155, the word “fourteen” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 8.
Section 68 of chapter 60, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 9,
the word “sixteen” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 8.
of 1